Alabama, session 2026rs, HB143.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
Section 1. This act shall be known and may be cited as
The Devinee and John Wesley Safe Streets Act.
Section 2. Sections 13A-6-4 and 32-10-6, Code of
Alabama 1975, are amended to read as follows:
"§13A-6-4
(a) A person commits the crime of criminally negligent
homicide if he or she causes the death of another person by
criminal negligence.
(b) The jury may consider statutes and ordinances
regulating the actor's conduct in determining whether the
actor is culpably negligent under subsection (a).
(c) Criminally negligent homicide is a Class A
misdemeanor, except in cases in which the criminally negligent
homicide is caused by the driver or operator of a vehicle or
vessel who is driving or operating the vehicle or vessel in
violation of Section 32-5A-191 or 32-5A-191.3; in these cases,
criminally negligent homicide is a Class C B felony."
"§32-10-6
Page 2

"§32-10-6
HB143 INTRODUCED
(a) Every person convicted of violating Sections
32-10-1 through 32-10-5 or any of the provisions thereof, when
such violation involved only damage to property, shall be
punished the same as prescribed by law for as follows:
(1) For a violation involving only damage to property,
a Class A misdemeanor; provided, however, that every person
convicted of violating such sections, or any provisions
thereof, when such.
(2) For a violation involved death or personal
involving physical injury, shall be punished the same as
prescribed by law for a Class C felony.
(3) For a violation involving serious physical injury,
a Class B felony.
(4) For a violation involving death, a Class A felony.
(b) Any individual who suffers any damage or loss in
connection with criminal conduct that results in a conviction
for any violation of Sections 32-10-1 through 32-10-5 shall be
considered a victim for the purposes of Article 4A of Chapter
18 of Title 15 of the Code of Alabama 1975."
Section 3. This act shall become effective on October
1, 2026.
Page 3